lecture_04/espa~nol-1.11/espa~nol.aff
    E R		> -ER, 'EDNOSLAS	# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, 'EDNOSLES	# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IDMELO		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IDMELA		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IDMELE		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IDMELOS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IDMELAS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IDMELES		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IDSELO		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IDSELA		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IDSELE		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IDSELOS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IDSELAS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IDSELES		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IOSLO		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IOSLA		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IOSLE		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IOSLOS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IOSLAS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IOSLES		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IDNOSLO		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IDNOSLA		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IDNOSLE		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IDNOSLOS	# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IDNOSLAS	# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IDNOSLES	# comer > comerse
